South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S807.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 11, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-11-317. (A) For the purposes of this section, "doe" or "does" means a biologically female deer, not to include antlerless male deer or bucks. (B) The open season for does is January second through January thirty-first. (C) In all game zones, the department may issue individual tags for does, which must be used as prescribed by the department. These tags are valid statewide and must be possessed and used only by the individual to whom the tags are issued. (D) It is unlawful to take, possess, or transport does, except as permitted by this section or otherwise provided by law. A person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than fifty and not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned not more than thirty days. SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-9-42. (A) For the privilege of hunting and taking does pursuant to Section 39-11-317, a person must obtain the required hunting license, any other required permits, and a set of special doe season tags from the department issued in the person's name. (B) Residents, including people under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees, may purchase up to three special doe season tags for five dollars per tag. (C) Nonresidents may purchase up to two special doe season tags for fifteen dollars per tag. (D) The department shall issue guidance to hunters who purchase special doe season tags indicating the distinction between does and antlerless deer pursuant to Section 50-11-317 and aiding in the identification of male and female deer in the field. SECTION 3.  Section 50-9-650 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 50-9-650.  (A)(1) For the privilege of hunting and taking deer on property with a Deer Quota Program permit, a person must obtain the required hunting license, any other required permits, and have access and authorization to utilize Deer Quota Program tags for the property on which the person is hunting. (2) A landowner or lessee may apply to the Deer Quota Program for a permit at a cost of fifty dollars per land tract application. The applicant may request a quota for antlerless deer, antlered deer, or both antlered and antlerless deer. The department shall determine an appropriate number of Deer Quota Program tags for antlered and antlerless deer to be issued under each permit, and there is no cost for these tags. (B)(1) For the privilege of hunting and taking deer on property without a Deer Quota Program permit, a person must obtain the required hunting license, any other required permits, and a set of individual deer tags from the department issued in the person's name. (2)(a) With the purchase of a South Carolina hunting license and a big game permit, a resident shall be issued two eight individual antlerless deer tags and three unrestricted individual antlered deer tags. Persons under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees may receive these tags upon request to the department. Residents, including persons under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees also may purchase: (i) two antler restriction individual antlered deer tags valid for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread for five dollars per tag.;  and (ii) additional individual antlerless deer tags for five dollars per tag. (b) Fees for nonresident deer tags are as follows: (i) fifty dollars for the first antlered deer tag and twenty dollars for each additional antlered deer tag up to a maximum of four tags;  two of which must be an antler restriction individual antlered deer tag valid only for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread;  and (ii) ten dollars per individual antlerless deer tag. (C) Upon issuing antlerless deer tags, the department shall print and distribute a card, brochure, or other literature as determined by the department encouraging hunters to take antlerless deer and featuring the words "Save Our Herd. Take a Doe." SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----